Montana, session 2025, HB547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
(Refer to First Reading/Second House (Blue) Bill)
Strike everything after the enacting clause and insert:
Section 1. Fire department provisions. The fire department of the municipality must have a director
of fire service or a fire chief, who shall manage and control the department in the manner prescribed by the
ordinances of the municipality.
Section 2. Section 7-33-2110, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-33-2110. Volunteer fire districts or companies -- fire departments -- pension not affected by
city-county consolidation. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the adoption of a city-county
consolidated local government has no effect on the existence of a volunteer fire department, a volunteer fire
company, or a fire district created and legally in existence pursuant to the provisions of this part unless
otherwise specifically provided by charter.
(2) A right or benefit of any member of a volunteer fire district, company, or department created
pursuant to the provisions of this part in a retirement or pension plan or payments provided under Title 19,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 547
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 547
chapter 17, may not be abrogated by the adoption of a city-county consolidated local government unless
otherwise specifically provided by charter."
Section 3. Section 7-33-2316, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-33-2316. Volunteer fire districts or companies -- fire departments -- pension not affected by
city-county consolidation. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the adoption of a city-county
consolidated local government has no effect on the existence of a volunteer fire department, a volunteer fire
company, or a fire district created and legally in existence pursuant to the provisions of this part unless
otherwise specifically provided by charter.
(2) A right or benefit of any member of a volunteer fire district, company, or department created
pursuant to the provisions of this part in a retirement or pension plan or payments provided under Title 19,
chapter 17, may not be abrogated by the adoption of a city-county consolidated local government unless
otherwise specifically provided by charter."
Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
7, chapter 3, part 11, and the provisions of Title 7, chapter 3, part 11, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 547
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 547, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 547
INTRODUCED BY S. DEMAROIS, D. HARVEY, S. NOVAK, D. HAWK, M. LEE, J. LYNCH
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO FIRE PROTECTION IN CONSOLIDATED CITY-COUNTY
GOVERNMENTS; REMOVING LANGUAGE FOR EXISTING VOLUNTEER FIRE DEPARTMENTS UNDER THE
JURISDICTION OF A CONSOLIDATED CITY-COUNTY GOVERNMENT; CLARIFYING THAT THERE MUST
BE A FIRE CHIEF FROM THE MUNICIPALITY OF A CONSOLIDATED CITY-COUNTY GOVERNMENT THAT
CONSOLIDATED UNDER OPTION 1; AND AMENDING SECTION 7-3-1345 SECTIONS 7-33-2110 AND 7-33-
2316, MCA; AND REPEALING SECTIONS 7-33-2110 AND 7-33-2316, MCA.”